Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.130

City manager—Removal—Reply and hearing.

The city manager may, within thirty days from the date of service upon him or her of a copy thereof, reply in writing to the resolution stating the council's intention to remove him or her. In the event no reply is timely filed, the resolution shall upon the thirty-first day from the date of such service, constitute the final resolution removing the manager, and his or her services shall terminate upon that day. If a reply shall be timely filed with its clerk, the council shall fix a time for a public hearing upon the question of the manager's removal and a final resolution removing the manager shall not be adopted until a public hearing has been had. The action of the council in removing the manager shall be final.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2027; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.130. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 18; prior: 1943 c 271 s 14, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-23, part.]